Illinois, session 104th, HB46.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 4.01 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4.01)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 4.01. License requirement; application; notice; 10Department of Early Childhood. 11    (a) Any person, group of persons or corporation who or 12which receives children or arranges for care of one or more 13children unrelated to the operator must apply for a license to 14operate one of the types of facilities defined in Sections 152.09, 2.18, and 2.20.16    (b) Application for a license to operate a day care 17center, day care home, or group day care home must be made to 18the Department of Early Childhood in the manner and on forms 19prescribed by it. If an applicant requests that the 20application be offered in a language other than English, the 21Department of Early Childhood or its successor must 22accommodate the request. 23    (c) If, upon examination of the facility and investigation   HB0046- 2 -LRB104 03156 AAS 13177 b1of persons responsible for care of children, the Department of 2Early Childhood is satisfied that the facility and responsible 3persons reasonably meet standards prescribed for the type of 4facility for which application is made, it shall issue a 5license in proper form, designating on that license the type 6of child care facility and the number of children to be served 7at any one time.8(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26.)